District of Columbia statutes.
25-339

Special restrictions for the Georgetown historic district.

(a)

The number of nightclub or tavern license holders, class C or D, within the Georgetown historic district shall not exceed 6. No existing nightclub or tavern license shall be transferred to any other person or to any other location within the Georgetown historic district, except when the number of such licensed establishments in the Georgetown historic district is 6 or less.

(b)

A licensee of a nightclub license, or a tavern license, class C, within the Georgetown historic district as of May 24, 1994, may apply for a conversion to a restaurant license, class C or D, for its present location, present owner, and for the duration of its present license. The application shall not require a public hearing or the assessment of fees.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(b)(4), 62 DCR 1866

History

1981 Ed., § 25-339.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-39, in former § 25-115(k), deleted the period at the end of the first sentence and added “; provided, that with regard to the establishment located at 3148-3150 M Street, N.W., known as Moustache, Inc. t/a Nathans, the Class CT license may be transferred once by the Board, after determining that the requirements of section 16 have been met, to an entity controlled by the individual who controls Moustache, Inc. on the effective date of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act Tavern Exception Amendment Act of 1999.”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 rewrote (a).

Effect of Amendments